public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# piante e mistièri (-(i)èr/-(i)er, -aro, -dor/-tor, -(i)ol/-(i)òl)
SFX v0 Y 84
SFX v0 èr er/M0Pd èr
SFX v0 èr ar/M0 èr
SFX v0 èr ereto/M0FSPd èr	ds:eto
SFX v0 èr areto/M0FSPd èr	ds:eto
SFX v0 èra ara/F0 èra
SFX v0 èra era/F0 èra
SFX v0 èra ereta/F0 èra	ds:eto
SFX v0 èra areta/F0 èra	ds:eto
SFX v0 ièr er/M0Pd ièr
SFX v0 ièr èr/M0 ièr
SFX v0 ièr ar/M0 ièr
SFX v0 ièr ereto/M0FSPd ièr	ds:eto
SFX v0 ièr areto/M0FSPd ièr	ds:eto
SFX v0 ièra ara/F0 ièra
SFX v0 ièra èra/F0 ièra
SFX v0 ièra era/F0 ièra
SFX v0 ièra ereta/F0 ièra	ds:eto
SFX v0 ièra areta/F0 ièra	ds:eto
SFX v0 èr ier/M0Pd [^aeoucijɉlñ]èr
SFX v0 èr ièr/M0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èr
SFX v0 èr iar/M0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èr
SFX v0 èr iereto/M0FSPd [^aeoucijɉlñ]èr	ds:eto
SFX v0 èr iareto/M0FSPd [^aeoucijɉlñ]èr	ds:eto
SFX v0 èra iara/F0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èra
SFX v0 èra ièra/F0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èra
SFX v0 èra iera/F0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èra
SFX v0 èra iereta/F0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èra	ds:eto
SFX v0 èra iareta/F0 [^aeoucijɉlñ]èra	ds:eto
SFX v0 0 eto/M0FSPd [aei]dor	ds:eto
SFX v0 dor or/M0Pd [^edjɉnñrt]idor
SFX v0 dor or/M0Pd [aeiou]idor
SFX v0 idor ïor/M0Pd [^aeiou]idor
SFX v0 dor or/M0Pd [ae]dor
SFX v0 dor tor/M0Pd [aei]dor
SFX v0 dor oreto/M0FSPd [ae]dor	ds:eto
SFX v0 dor oreto/M0FSPd [^edjɉnñrt]idor	ds:eto
SFX v0 dor oreto/M0FSPd [aeiou]idor	ds:eto
SFX v0 idor ïoreto/M0FSPd [^aeiou]idor	ds:eto
SFX v0 dor toreto/M0FSPd [aei]dor	ds:eto
SFX v0 a eta/F0 [aei]dora	ds:eto
SFX v0 dora ora/F0 [ae]dora
SFX v0 dora ora/F0 [^edjɉnñrt]idora
SFX v0 dora ora/F0 [aeiou]idora
SFX v0 idora ïora/F0 [^aeiou]idora
SFX v0 dora tora/F0 [aei]dora
SFX v0 dora oreta/F0 [ae]dora	ds:eto
SFX v0 dora oreta/F0 [^edjɉnñrt]idora	ds:eto
SFX v0 dora oreta/F0 [aeiou]idora	ds:eto
SFX v0 idora ïoreta/F0 [^aeiou]idora	ds:eto
SFX v0 dora toreta/F0 [aei]dora	ds:eto
SFX v0 r ora/F0 [^èo]r
SFX v0 r dora/F0 [^èo]r
SFX v0 r or/M0Pd [^èo]r
SFX v0 r tora/F0 [^èo]r
SFX v0 r dor/M0Pd [^èo]r
SFX v0 r oreta/F0 [^èo]r	ds:eto
SFX v0 r tor/M0Pd [^èo]r
SFX v0 r doreta/F0 [^èo]r	ds:eto
SFX v0 r toreta/F0 [^èo]r	ds:eto
SFX v0 r oreto/M0FSPd [^èo]r	ds:eto
SFX v0 r doreto/M0FSPd [^èo]r	ds:eto
SFX v0 r toreto/M0FSPd [^èo]r	ds:eto
SFX v0 rò ora/F0 rò
SFX v0 rò dora/F0 rò
SFX v0 rò or/M0Pd rò
SFX v0 rò tora/F0 rò
SFX v0 rò dor/M0Pd rò
SFX v0 rò oreta/F0 rò	ds:eto
SFX v0 rò tor/M0Pd rò
SFX v0 rò doreta/F0 rò	ds:eto
SFX v0 rò toreta/F0 rò	ds:eto
SFX v0 rò oreto/M0FSPd rò	ds:eto
SFX v0 rò doreto/M0FSPd rò	ds:eto
SFX v0 rò toreto/M0FSPd rò	ds:eto
SFX v0 ol òl/M0B1 [dđñrsŧx]ol
SFX v0 0 eto/M0FSPd [dđñrsŧx]ol	ds:eto
SFX v0 ol iol/M0B1Pd [dđrsŧx]ol
SFX v0 ol ioleto/M0FSPd [dđrsŧx]ol	ds:eto
SFX v0 ol iòl/M0B1 [dđrsŧx]ol
SFX v0 ola òla/F0 [dđñrsŧx]ola
SFX v0 a eta/F0 [dđñrsŧx]ola	ds:eto
SFX v0 ola iola/F0 [dđrsŧx]ola
SFX v0 ola ioleta/F0 [dđrsŧx]ola	ds:eto
SFX v0 ola iòla/F0 [dđrsŧx]ola

# piante e mistièri ko èle vanesente (-èr, -aro, -(i)oƚo/-(i)òƚo)
SFX v7 Y 70
SFX v7 a eta/F0 [ñrsx]oƚa	ds:eto
SFX v7 o eto/M0Pd [dñrsx]oƚo	ds:eto
SFX v7 0 eto/M0Pd [aei]dor	ds:eto
SFX v7 èr er/M0Pd ièr
SFX v7 oƚa òƚa/F0 [ñrsx]oƚa
SFX v7 oƚa ioƚa/F0 [rsx]oƚa
SFX v7 oƚa iòƚa/F0 [rsx]oƚa
SFX v7 oƚa ioƚeta/F0 [rsx]oƚa	ds:eto
SFX v7 oƚo òƚo/M0 [dñrsx]oƚo
SFX v7 oƚo iòƚo/M0 [drsx]oƚo
SFX v7 oƚo ioƚo/M0Pd [drsx]oƚo
SFX v7 oƚo ioƚeto/M0Pd [drsx]oƚo	ds:eto
SFX v7 ièr èr/M0 ièr
SFX v7 ièr ar/M0 ièr
SFX v7 ièr er/M0Pd ièr
SFX v7 ièr areto/M0Pd ièr	ds:eto
SFX v7 ièr ereto/M0Pd ièr	ds:eto
SFX v7 dor or/M0Pd [ae]dor
SFX v7 dor or/M0Pd [^edjɉnñrt]idor
SFX v7 dor or/M0Pd [aeiou]idor
SFX v7 idor ïor/M0Pd [^aeiou]idor
SFX v7 dor tor/M0Pd [aei]dor
SFX v7 dor oreto/M0Pd [ae]dor	ds:eto
SFX v7 dor oreto/M0Pd [^edjɉnñrt]idor	ds:eto
SFX v7 dor oreto/M0Pd [aeiou]idor	ds:eto
SFX v7 idor ïoreto/M0Pd [^aeiou]idor	ds:eto
SFX v7 dor toreto/M0Pd [aei]dor	ds:eto
SFX v7 r ora/F0 r
SFX v7 r dora/F0 r
SFX v7 r or/M0Pd r
SFX v7 r tora/F0 r
SFX v7 r dor/M0Pd r
SFX v7 r oreta/F0 r	ds:eto
SFX v7 r tor/M0Pd r
SFX v7 r doreta/F0 r	ds:eto
SFX v7 r toreta/F0 r	ds:eto
SFX v7 r oreto/M0Pd r	ds:eto
SFX v7 r doreto/M0Pd r	ds:eto
SFX v7 r toreto/M0Pd r	ds:eto
SFX v7 èr ar/M0 èr
SFX v7 èr ièr/M0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX v7 èr ier/M0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX v7 èr areto/M0Pd [^i]èr	ds:eto
SFX v7 èr ereto/M0Pd [^i]èr	ds:eto
SFX v7 èr iereto/M0Pd [^aeoucijɉñ]èr	ds:eto
SFX v7 a eta/F0 [aei]dora	ds:eto
SFX v7 ièra ara/F0 ièra
SFX v7 ièra era/F0 ièra
SFX v7 ièra areta/F0 ièra	ds:eto
SFX v7 ièra ereta/F0 ièra	ds:eto
SFX v7 ièra èra/F0 ièra
SFX v7 dora ora/F0 [ae]dora
SFX v7 dora ora/F0 [^edjɉnñrt]idora
SFX v7 dora ora/F0 [aeiou]idora
SFX v7 idora ïora/F0 [^aeiou]idora
SFX v7 dora tora/F0 [aei]dora
SFX v7 dora oreta/F0 [ae]dora	ds:eto
SFX v7 dora oreta/F0 [^edjɉnñrt]idora	ds:eto
SFX v7 dora oreta/F0 [aeiou]idora	ds:eto
SFX v7 idora ïoreta/F0 [^aeiou]idora	ds:eto
SFX v7 dora toreta/F0 [aei]dora	ds:eto
SFX v7 èra ara/F0 [^i]èra
SFX v7 èra era/F0 [^i]èra
SFX v7 èra iara/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX v7 èra iera/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX v7 èra ièra/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX v7 èra areta/F0 [^i]èra	ds:eto
SFX v7 èra ereta/F0 [^i]èra	ds:eto
SFX v7 èra iareta/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra	ds:eto
SFX v7 èra iereta/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra	ds:eto


# nominali deajetivali (-eŧa)
SFX eZ Y 4
SFX eZ a eŧa/F0 a	is:singular+femenine
SFX eZ o eŧa/F0 o	is:singular+femenine
SFX eZ 0 ŧa/F0 [^d]e	is:singular+femenine
SFX eZ òde odeŧa/F0 òde	is:singular+femenine

# nominali deajetivali (-esa)
SFX eS Y 4
SFX eS a esa/F0 a	is:singular+femenine
SFX eS o esa/F0 o	is:singular+femenine
SFX eS 0 sa/F0 [^d]e	is:singular+femenine
SFX eS òde odesa/F0 òde	is:singular+femenine

# nominali deajetivali (-iŧia)
SFX iZ Y 2
SFX iZ 0 iŧia/F0 l	is:singular+femenine
SFX iZ o iŧia/F0 o	is:singular+femenine

# nominali deajetivali (-isia)
SFX iS Y 3
SFX iS 0 isia/F0 l	is:singular+femenine
SFX iS e isia/F0 ƚe	is:singular+femenine
SFX iS o isia/F0 o	is:singular+femenine


# nominali deverbali (-mento)
SFX m0 Y 7
SFX m0 0 mento/M0FSPd a	is:singular+masculine ds:mento
SFX m0 0 amènto/M0FS n	ds:mento
SFX m0 0 amento/M0FSPd n	ds:mento
SFX m0 o amènto/M0FS [^c]o	ds:mento
SFX m0 o amento/M0FSPd [^c]o	ds:mento
SFX m0 òco ocamènto/M0FS òco	ds:mento
SFX m0 òco ocamento/M0FSPd òco	ds:mento

# nominali deverbali ko èle vanesente (-mento)
#SFX m7 Y 2
#SFX m7 r mento/M0Pd r	ds:mento
#SFX m7 r mènto/M0 r	ds:mento

# nominali deverbali (-ŧion)
#SFX z0 Y 16
#SFX z0 r ŧion/F0BBu1Pd ar
#SFX z0 erò ŧion/F0B1BuPd aerò
#SFX z0 r ŧion/F0B1BuPd [^uü]ir
#SFX z0 ir ŧion/F0B1BuPd [uü]ir
#SFX z0 erò iŧion/F0B1BuPd terò
#SFX z0 merò nŧion/F0B1BuPd merò
#SFX z0 nerò xiŧion/F0B1BuPd nerò
#SFX z0 ñerò nŧion/F0B1BuPd ñerò
#SFX z0 erò ion/F0B1BuPd [đsŧ]erò
#SFX z0 derò uŧion/F0B1BuPd lderò
#SFX z0 derò ŧion/F0B1BuPd nderò
#SFX z0 verò ŧion/F0B1BuPd iverò
#SFX z0 verò uŧion/F0B1BuPd lverò
#SFX z0 guerò ŧion/F0B1BuPd guerò
#SFX z0 xerò ŧion/F0B1BuPd [^r]xerò
#SFX z0 orxerò ureŧion/F0B1BuPd orxerò

# nominali deverbali (-sion)
#SFX s0 Y 15
#SFX s0 r sion/F0B1BuPd [^i]r
#SFX s0 erò sion/F0B1BuPd aerò
#SFX s0 r sion/F0B1BuPd [^uü]ir
#SFX s0 ir sion/F0B1BuPd [uü]ir
#SFX s0 erò ision/F0B1BuPd terò
#SFX s0 merò nsion/F0B1BuPd merò
#SFX s0 nerò xision/F0B1BuPd nerò
#SFX s0 ñerò nsion/F0B1BuPd ñerò
#SFX s0 derò usion/F0B1BuPd lderò
#SFX s0 derò sion/F0B1BuPd nderò
#SFX s0 verò sion/F0B1BuPd iverò
#SFX s0 verò usion/F0B1BuPd lverò
#SFX s0 guerò sion/F0B1BuPd guerò
#SFX s0 xerò sion/F0B1BuPd [^r]xerò
#SFX s0 orxerò uresion/F0B1BuPd orxerò

# nominali deverbali ko èle vanesente (-sion)
#SFX s7 Y 4
#SFX s7 r sion/F0BuPd r
#SFX s7 xerò sion/F0BuPd xerò
#SFX s7 lderò ƚusion/F0BuPd lderò
#SFX s7 lverò ƚusion/F0BuPd lverò

# nominali deverbali (-dur/M0eT, -dura/F0eT)
SFX d0 Y 12
SFX d0 dur ur/M0 [^i]dur
SFX d0 dur ur/M0 [aeiou]idur
SFX d0 idur ïur/M0 [^aeiou]idur
SFX d0 dur ureto/M0FSPd [^i]dur	ds:eto
SFX d0 dur ureto/M0FSPd [aeiou]idur	ds:eto
SFX d0 idur ïureto/M0FSPd [^aeiou]idur	ds:eto
SFX d0 dura ura/F0 [^i]dura
SFX d0 dura ura/F0 [aeiou]idura
SFX d0 idura ïura/F0 [^aeiou]idura
SFX d0 dura ureta/F0 [^i]dura	ds:eto
SFX d0 dura ureta/F0 [aeiou]idura	ds:eto
SFX d0 idura ïureta/F0 [^aeiou]idura	ds:eto
