public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
bendadura/F0d0eT-1+0*0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
breviadura/F0d0eT@0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
dupiador/M0Pdv0-1+0.0^6	po:noun is:singular+masculine
feradura/F0d0eT-1+0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
foƚadora/F0v7@0.0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
gonfiadura/F0d0eT-1*0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
inkrespadura/F0d0eT	po:noun is:singular+femenine
kagadora/F0v0+0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
kartadura/F0d0eT-1+0*0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
librèra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
limadura/F0d0eT-0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
ƚavorador/M0Pdv7	po:noun is:singular+masculine
paƚador/M0Pdv7-1+0*0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
paŧifegador/M0Pdv0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
pisedura/F0d0eT*0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
rusadura/F0d0eT	po:noun is:singular+femenine
sernidora/F0v0-1+0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
sobatidura/F0d0eT	po:noun is:singular+femenine
spoƚadora/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
stüadora/F0v0-0+0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
testadura/F0d0eT@0-1+0:0^2	po:noun is:singular+femenine
vestidura/F0d0eT-1+0.0^1^6^7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
xjonfadora/F0v0-0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
drapo/M0FSeLe7eTm0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
visin/M0BuaTeLe7m0:0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
mal/MFaZaSeTiZiSoT	po:noun is:singular+masculine
maƚe/MFaLe1iSoL	po:noun is:singular+masculine
manxoƚo/M0Pdv7	po:noun is:singular+masculine
braso/M0FSeTiNo0o2o4oTm0@0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
braŧo/M0FSeTiNo0o2o4oTm0@0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
bròjo/M0B1eTeZeSo0o1o2o3o4	po:noun is:singular+masculine
bròɉo/M0eTeZeSo0o1o2o3o4	po:noun is:singular+masculine
ostregèra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
stranio/M0eTeZeS	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+masculine
vexin/M0BuaTeLe7m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
bigoƚèra/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
montañèra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
anda/F0m0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
dasièra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
fritoƚèra/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
kagadur/M0d0eT	po:noun is:singular+masculine
ocaƚèra/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
pròde/M0eZeS	po:noun is:singular+masculine
skorsèr/M0Buv0r0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
ventoƚèra/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
skudeƚèra/F0v7	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+femenine
stranudo/M0FSiZiSy0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
tastarola/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
alŧo/M0FSV3m0.0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
armo/M0m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
baldo/M0FSiNeZeSo0o1o2o3o4	po:noun is:singular+masculine
batòco/M0FSo0o2o4m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
bojo/M0B1eZeSaZaSeTo0o2o4	po:noun is:singular+masculine
boɉo/M0eZeSaZaSeTo0o2o4	po:noun is:singular+masculine
futiño/M0m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
koaroƚa/F0v7*0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
mite/X0eZeS	po:noun is:singular
relasato/A1FSeZeS	po:noun is:singular+masculine
reƚasato/A1eS	po:noun is:singular+masculine
salegèra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
sfasato/M0FSiNeS	po:noun is:singular+masculine
sfaŧato/M0FSiNeZ	po:noun is:singular+masculine
sfrenato/A1FSeZeS	po:noun is:singular+masculine
tato/A1FSeZeS	po:noun is:singular+masculine+infantil st:binbo
vesin/M0BuaTeLe7m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
viŧin/M0Bum0eL	po:noun is:singular+masculine
xbrego/M0FSeTo0o2o4m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
peƚaƚièra/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
botiđo/M0m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
bagordo/M0m0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
fiera/F0eZeSeT	po:noun is:singular+femenine
inŧerpidura/F0d0eT	po:noun is:singular+femenine dp:in
soxinèr/M0Buv0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
babaroƚo/M0Pdv7	po:noun is:singular+masculine
fresèra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
strano/M0FSeTeZeS	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+masculine
straño/M0FSeTeZeS-0	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+masculine
filandèra/F0v0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
fiƚandèra/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
püinaroƚa/F0v7	po:noun is:singular+femenine
trotador/M0Pdv0	po:noun is:singular+masculine
domegadura/F0d0eT	po:noun is:singular+femenine
kanoƚèr/M0Buv7	po:noun is:singular+masculine
